fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX d0 Y 144
SFX d0 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 er ant/n'q'd'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 eter ette/j'n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d0 eter ette/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ète/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle/j'n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èle/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elle/j'n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eler èle/j'n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 er è/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d0 eter ettes/n'q'l'm't' jeter
SFX d0 eter ettes/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètes/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d0 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èles/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eler èles/n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 er ons/n'q'l't' er
SFX d0 er ez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d0 eter ettent/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d0 eter ettent/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètent/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlent/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlent/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 er ais/j'n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d0 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 er ions/n'q'l't' er
SFX d0 er iez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d0 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 er ai/j'n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d0 er as/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d0 er a/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 er âmes/n'q'l't' er
SFX d0 er âtes/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d0 er èrent/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 eter etterai/j'n'q'l'm't' jeter
SFX d0 eter etterai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerai/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eter etteras/n'q'l'm't' jeter
SFX d0 eter etteras/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteras/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleras/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eler èleras/n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eter ettera/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d0 eter ettera/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ètera/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlera/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlera/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eter etterons/n'q'l't' jeter
SFX d0 eter etterons/n'q'l't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterons/n'q'l't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerons/n'q'l't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerons/n'q'l't' épeler
SFX d0 eter etterez/n'q'l'm' jeter
SFX d0 eter etterez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerez/n'q'l'm' épeler
SFX d0 eter etteront/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d0 eter etteront/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteront/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleront/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eler èleront/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eter etterais/j'n'q'l'm't' jeter
SFX d0 eter etterais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerais/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eter etterait/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d0 eter etterait/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterait/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerait/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerait/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eter etterions/n'q'l't' jeter
SFX d0 eter etterions/n'q'l't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èterions/n'q'l't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' ppeler
SFX d0 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èlerions/n'q'l't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' épeler
SFX d0 eler èlerions/n'q'l't' épeler
SFX d0 eter etteriez/n'q'l'm' jeter
SFX d0 eter etteriez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteriez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleriez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' épeler
SFX d0 eler èleriez/n'q'l'm' épeler
SFX d0 eter etteraient/n'q'l'm't's' jeter
SFX d0 eter etteraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter èteraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler
SFX d0 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èleraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 eler èleraient/n'q'l'm't's' épeler
SFX d0 er asse/j'n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d0 er asses/n'q'l'm't' er
SFX d0 er ât/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 er assions/n'q'l't' er
SFX d0 er assiez/n'q'l'm' er
SFX d0 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' er
SFX d0 eter ette/n'l'm't' jeter
SFX d0 eter ette/n'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eter ète/n'l'm't' [^j]eter
SFX d0 eler elle/n'l'm't' ppeler
SFX d0 eler elle/n'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler èle/n'l'm't' [^p].eler
SFX d0 eler elle/n'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 eler èle/n'l'm't' épeler
SFX d0 er ons/n'l't' er
SFX d0 er ez/n'l'm' er

SFX aA Y 54
SFX aA ller ller/n'q'd'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llant/n'q'd'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llé/q' aller
SFX aA ller llés/q' aller
SFX aA ller llée/q' aller
SFX aA ller llées/q' aller
SFX aA aller vais/j'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller vas/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller va/c'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llons/n'q'l't' aller
SFX aA ller llez/n'q'l'm' aller
SFX aA aller vont/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llais/j'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llait/c'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llions/n'q'l't' aller
SFX aA ller lliez/n'q'l'm' aller
SFX aA ller llaient/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llai/j'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llas/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller lla/c'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llâmes/n'q'l't' aller
SFX aA ller llâtes/n'q'l'm' aller
SFX aA ller llèrent/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irai/j'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller iras/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller ira/c'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irons/n'q'l't' aller
SFX aA aller irez/n'q'l'm' aller
SFX aA aller iront/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irais/j'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irait/c'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller irions/n'q'l't' aller
SFX aA aller iriez/n'q'l'm' aller
SFX aA aller iraient/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller ille/j'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller illes/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llions/n'q'l't' aller
SFX aA ller lliez/n'q'l'm' aller
SFX aA ller illent/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llasse/j'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llasses/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llât/c'n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA ller llassions/n'q'l't' aller
SFX aA ller llassiez/n'q'l'm' aller
SFX aA ller llassent/n'q'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller va/n'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller vas-y/n'l'm't' aller
SFX aA aller va-t'en/n'l' aller
SFX aA ller llons/n'l't' aller
SFX aA ller llons-y/n'l' aller
SFX aA ller llons-nous-en/n'l' aller
SFX aA ller llez/n'l'm' aller
SFX aA ller llez-y/n'l' aller
SFX aA ller llez-vous-en/n'l' aller
